Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.295

Agency agreements—Written notice to director.

On or before the date on which a bank enters into any agency agreement authorizing another entity, as agent of the bank, to receive deposits or renew time deposits, the bank shall give written notice to the director of the existence of that agency arrangement. The notice is not effective until it has been delivered to the office of the director.

[ 1996 c 2 s 7. Formerly RCW 30.04.295.]